District of Columbia statutes.
31-3303.04

Reference to plan sponsor.

In applying this subchapter in the case of health insurance coverage that is made available by a health insurer in the group market to employers only through one or more associations, a reference to “plan sponsor” is deemed, with respect to coverage provided to an employer member of the association, to include a reference to such employer.

Apr. 13, 1999, D.C. Law 12-209, § 304, 45 DCR 8433

History

1981 Ed., § 35-1034.

Prior Codifications

See notes to § 31-3301.01.

Emergency Legislation

Temporary addition of chapter: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 31-3301.01.

Editor's Notes